Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-213
Lunch hour; violation; penalty.

Any person, firm or corporation violating any of the provisions of section 48-212 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1931, c. 96, § 2, p. 266;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-216;

R.S.1943, § 48-213;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 275.